test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-test_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - derivašuvdna: 
    čaahâđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: čaahâliđ
    vaattâđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: vaattâliđ
    jotteeđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: juttâliđ
    kalveđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: kalveliđ
    kästiđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: kastâliđ
    kavnâđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: kavnâliđ
    peehiđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: peehâliđ
    kiessâđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: kiessâliđ
    kiessâđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: kiessâliđ
    moonnâđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: monnâliđ
    toideđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: toideliđ
    ruottâđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: ryettâliđ
    spellâđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: spellâliđ
    čivgâđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: čivgâliđ
    toohâđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: tohâliđ
    luuhâđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: luhâliđ
    puurrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: purrâliđ
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: tooijâliđ
    viiššâđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: viššâliđ
      
    čaahâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čaahâl
    vaattâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaattâl
    jotteeđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juuttâl
    kalveđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kalvel
    kästiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kastâl
    kavnâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kavnâl
    peehiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peehâl
    kiessâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiessâl
    kiessâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiessâl
    moonnâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: moonnâl
    toideđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: toidel
    ruottâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruottâl
    spellâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: spellâl
    čivgâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čivgâl
    toohâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: toohâl
    luuhâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luuhâl
    puurrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puurrâl
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tooijâl
    viiššâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viiššâl

    čaahâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čaahâl
    vaattâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vaattâl
    jotteeđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: juuttâl
    kalveđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kalvel
    kästiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kastâl
    kavnâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kavnâl
    peehiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: peehâl
    kiessâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kiessâl
    kiessâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kiessâl
    moonnâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: moonnâl
    toideđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: toidel
    ruottâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ruottâl
    spellâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: speellâl
    čivgâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čiivgâl
    toohâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: toohâl
    luuhâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: luuhâl
    puurrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: puurrâl
    tuáijiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: tooijâl
    viiššâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: viiššâl
